Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle H. Compliance with Help America Vote Act of 2002.

§ 23-15-169.
Secretary of State to establish administrative complaint procedure for handling grievances.

The Secretary of State shall, by rule and regulation, establish an administrative complaint procedure for handling grievances in accordance with the Help America Vote Act of 2002.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 2, eff July 12, 2004 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).

§ 23-15-169.1.
Secretary of State and Commissioner of Public Safety to enter agreement granting access to driver’s license and identification cardholder databases for purpose of matching information in Statewide Elections Management System.

The Secretary of State and the Commissioner of Public Safety shall enter into an agreement to grant the Secretary of State’s Office “read only” access to the driver’s license database and identification cardholder database for the purpose of matching information in the database of the Statewide Elections Management System created in Section 23-15-163 et seq. to the extent required to enable the Secretary of State to verify the accuracy of information provided on applications for voter registration in compliance with the Help America Vote Act of 2002.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-169.2.
Commissioner of Public Safety to enter agreement with Commissioner of Social Security to verify accuracy of information provided with respect to applications for voter registration.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall enter into an agreement with the Commissioner of Social Security under Section 205 (r) (8) of the Social Security Act in accordance with the Help America Vote Act of 2002 to verify the accuracy of applicable information provided by the Commissioner of Public Safety with respect to applications for voter registration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 4, eff July 12, 2004 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).

§ 23-15-169.3.
Secretary of State authorized to accept and expend federal funds under Help America Vote Act of 2002; eligibility for federal funds of counties purchasing voting systems that comply with Act.

The Secretary of State shall have the authority to accept federal funds authorized under the Help America Vote Act of 2002 and to meet all the requirements of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 in order to expend the funds.

Counties that purchase or have purchased since January 1, 2001, voting systems that comply with the requirements of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 shall be eligible for federal funds accepted by the Secretary of State for Help America Vote Act of 2002 compliance efforts. The only restriction that the Secretary of State may place on the expenditure of federal funds for the purchase of voting systems is that the systems comply with the criteria and rules established in the Help America Vote Act of 2002 for voting systems.

Counties may purchase voting systems under the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (HAVA) if:

The system selected is HAVA compliant as determined by the rules promulgated to effectuate the Help America Vote Act of 2002 in this state; and

The County Board of Supervisors spreads upon its minutes a certification of the following:

The county determined it is in its best interest to opt out of any statewide bulk purchase to be effectuated by the Secretary of State pursuant to his duties under HAVA;

The voting system selected by the county meets all of the foregoing requirements under HAVA;

The county understands and accepts any and all liability for said system; and

The county is solely responsible for the purchase of said system.

Upon meeting the foregoing requirements, a county shall be reimbursed for its costs for said system from the HAVA funds for this purpose; however, the county shall be limited in its reimbursement to an amount to be determined by the Secretary of State based upon an objective formula implemented for the statewide, bulk purchase of said voting systems. Any costs over and above the set formula described herein shall be the sole responsibility of the county.

In addition to other information required by paragraph (b) of this subsection, any county that purchases voting systems after June 6, 2005 shall spread upon its minutes certification of the following:

All voting systems within the county are the same, except those machines that are handicap accessible as required by HAVA; and

The voting systems have a device or mechanism that allows any votes cast to be verified by paper audit trail.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 5; Laws, 2005, ch. 534, § 16, eff June 6, 2005 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-169.4.
Information to be provided to absent uniformed services voters and overseas voters regarding voter registration and absentee ballot procedures.

The Secretary of State shall be responsible for providing to all absent uniformed services voters and overseas voters who wish to vote or register to vote in this state information required by the Help America Vote Act of 2002 regarding voter registration procedures and absentee ballot procedures to be used by absent uniformed services voters and overseas voters with respect to elections, including procedures relating to the use of the federal write-in absentee ballot.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 6, eff July 12, 2004 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).

§ 23-15-169.5.
Rules and regulations to be promulgated by the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the provisions of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 7, July 12, 2004 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).

§ 23-15-169.6.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 402, § 1, and ch. 441, § 191, effective from and after July 1, 2017.

§23-15-169.6. [Laws, 2005, ch. 534, § 18, eff June 6, 2005 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section.)]

§ 23-15-169.7.
“Help Mississippi Vote Fund” created; use of money in fund; funding of Office of Secretary of State expenses; deposit of user charges and fees authorized under this section into State General Fund and use of monies so deposited.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund, to be designated the “Help Mississippi Vote Fund” to the credit of the Secretary of State, which shall be comprised of the monies required to be deposited into the fund under Section 7-3-59, and any other funds that may be made available for the fund by the Legislature.

Monies in the fund shall be expended by the Secretary of State to support the state’s maintenance of efforts as required by the federal mandates of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 .

Unexpended amounts remaining in the special fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the special fund shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by line item appropriation from the State General Fund to the Office of Secretary of State and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law and as determined by the State Fiscal Officer, and shall not be authorized for expenditure by the Secretary of State to reimburse or otherwise defray expenses of any office administered by the Secretary of State.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 309, § 20; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 46; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 32; Laws, 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017); Laws, 2018, ch. 343, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).